Arkansas statutes. Title 18 Property
Chapter 44 Mechanics' and Materialmen's Liens
18-44-118. Filing of bond in contest of lien.

(a)(1)

In the event any person claiming a lien for labor or materials upon any property shall file such a lien within the time and in the manner required by law with the circuit clerk or other officer provided by law for the filing of such a lien, and if the owner of the property, any mortgagee or other person having an interest in the property, or any contractor, subcontractor, or other person liable for the payment of such a lien shall desire to contest the lien, then the person so desiring to contest the lien may file:

(A)

With the circuit clerk or other officer with whom the lien is filed as required by law a bond with surety, to be approved by the officer in the amount of the lien claimed; or

(B)

An action under subsection (f) of this section to protest the filing of the lien.

(2)

The bond shall be conditioned for the payment of the amount of the lien, or so much of the lien as may be established by suit, together with interest and the costs of the action, if upon trial it shall be found that the property was subject to the lien.

(b)(1)(A)

Upon the filing of the bond, if the circuit clerk or other officer before whom it is filed approves the surety, he or she shall give to the person claiming the lien, at his or her last known address, three (3) days' notice of the filing of the bond.

(B)

The notice shall be in writing and served by any:

(i)

Officer authorized by law to serve process in a civil action; or

(ii)

Form of mail addressed to the person to be served with a return receipt requested and delivery restricted to the addressee or the agent of the addressee.

(2)(A)

Within the three (3) days' notice, the person claiming the lien may appear and question the sufficiency of the surety or form of the bond.

(B)

At the expiration of three (3) days, if the person claiming the lien shall not have questioned the sufficiency of the bond or surety or if the circuit clerk finds the bond to be sufficient, the circuit clerk shall note the filing of the bond upon the margin of the lien record and the lien shall then be discharged and the claimant shall have recourse only against the principal and surety upon the bond.

(c)(1)

If no action to enforce the lien shall be filed within the time prescribed by law for the enforcement of a lien against the surety, the bond shall be null and void.

(2)

However, if any action shall be timely commenced, the surety shall be liable in like manner as the principal.

(d)

If the circuit clerk shall determine that the bond tendered is insufficient, the person tendering the bond shall have twenty-four (24) hours within which to tender a sufficient bond, and unless a sufficient bond shall be so tendered, the lien shall remain in full force and effect.

(e)(1)

Any party aggrieved by the acceptance or rejection of the bond may apply to any court of competent jurisdiction by an action which is appropriate.

(2)

Upon notice as required by law, the court shall have jurisdiction to enter an interlocutory order as may be necessary for the protection of the parties by:

(A)

Requiring additional security for the bond;

(B)

Reinstating the lien in default of the bond, pending trial and hearing; or

(C)

Requiring acceptance of the bond as may be necessary for the protection of the parties.

(f)(1)

A protest under subdivision (a)(1)(B) of this section shall be filed as a civil action in the circuit court of the county where the lien is filed.

(2)

The issues in the action shall be limited to whether:

(A)

The lien was filed in the form required by §18-44-117; and

(B)

All of the applicable requirements of §§18-44-114 and18-44-115 were satisfied.

(3)(A)

The summons shall be in customary form directed to the sheriff of the county in which the action is filed, with directions for service of the summons on the named defendants. In addition, the clerk of the circuit court shall issue and direct the sheriff to serve upon the named defendants a notice in the following form:

“NOTICE OF INTENTION TO DISCHARGE LIEN You are hereby notified that the attached complaint in the above-styled cause claims that you have not satisfied the requirements for claiming a lien upon the property described in the complaint and seeks to have the lien discharged by the court. If, within five (5) days, excluding Sundays and legal holidays, from the date of service of this notice, you have not filed in the office of the clerk of this court a written objection to the claims made against you by the plaintiff, then an order discharging the lien shall be issued immediately by the court. If you should file a written objection to the allegations of the complaint of the plaintiff within five (5) days, excluding Sundays and legal holidays, from the date of service of this notice, a hearing will be scheduled by the court to determine whether or not the lien should be discharged.”

Click to view form.

(B)

If within five (5) days, excluding Sundays and legal holidays, following service of the summons, complaint, and notice the defendant or defendants have not filed a written objection to the claim of the plaintiff, the court shall immediately issue an order discharging the lien upon the property described in the complaint.

(C)

If a written objection to the claim of the plaintiff is filed by the defendant or defendants within five (5) days from the date of service of the notice, summons, and complaint, the plaintiff shall obtain a date for the hearing of the plaintiff's complaint and shall give notice of the date, time, and place of the hearing to all defendants.

(4)(A)

The action shall be heard as expeditiously as the business of the circuit court permits.

(B)

Evidence may be presented by affidavit, subject to Rule 56(e),(f), and (g) of the Arkansas Rules of Civil Procedure.

(5)

If the circuit court finds that the lien was not in the form required by §18-44-117 or that the applicable requirements of §§18-44-114 and18-44-115 were not satisfied, then the circuit court shall enter an order discharging the lien.

(6)

The prevailing party shall be entitled to a reasonable attorney's fee and the costs of the protest.

(g)

Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the right of an owner, mortgagee, or any other person with an interest in the property to contest the lien by declaratory judgment proceedings under §16-111-101 et seq.

History.

Acts 1963, No. 66, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 51-641; Acts 2005, No. 2287, § 2; 2009, No. 454, § 3.

Amendments.

The 2005 amendment substituted “and served by any” for “sent by certified mail with return receipt requested” in (b)(1)(B); and added (b)(1)(B)(i), (b)(1)(B)(ii), and (f).

The 2009 amendment, in (a)(1), inserted (a)(1)(B) and redesignated the remaining text accordingly; inserted “circuit” in (d); inserted (f) and redesignated the subsequent subsection; and made related changes.

Cross References.

Bonds generally, §18-44-501 et seq.

18-44-119. Limitation of actions.

(a)

All actions under this subchapter shall be commenced within fifteen (15) months after filing the lien and prosecuted without unnecessary delay to final judgment.

(b)

No lien shall continue to exist by virtue of the provisions of this subchapter for more than fifteen (15) months after the lien is filed, unless within that time:

(1)

An action shall be instituted as described in this subchapter; and

(2)

A lis pendens is filed under §16-59-101 et seq.

History.

Acts 1895, No. 146, § 15, p. 217; 1899, No. 182, § 1, p. 322; C. & M. Dig., § 6926; Pope's Dig., § 8888; A.S.A. 1947, § 51-616; Acts 2005, No. 2287, § 4.

Amendments.

The 2005 amendment inserted the subdivision (1) designation in (b); added (b)(2); and made related changes.

18-44-120, 18-44-121. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

These sections, concerning jurisdiction to enforce liens and procedure generally, were repealed by Acts 1995, No. 1298, § 8. The sections were derived from the following sources:

18-44-120. Acts 1895, No. 146, § 17, p. 217; C. & M. Dig., § 6925; Pope's Dig., § 8887; A.S.A. 1947, § 51-615.

18-44-121. Acts 1895, No. 146, § 13, p. 217; C. & M. Dig., § 6927; Pope's Dig., § 8889; A.S.A. 1947, § 51-617. For present law, see §16-13-304.

18-44-122. Contents of complaint.

The complaint, among other things, shall allege the facts necessary for securing a lien under this subchapter and shall contain a description of the property to be charged with the lien.

History.

Acts 1895, No. 146, § 13, p. 217; C. & M. Dig., § 6927; Pope's Dig., § 8889; A.S.A. 1947, § 51-617; Acts 2009, No. 454, § 4.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment substituted “complaint” for “petition.”

Cross References.

Description of property, §18-44-117.

18-44-123. Parties to suits.

In all suits under this subchapter, the parties to the contract and all other persons interested in the controversy and in the property charged with the lien may be made parties to the suit. Those that are not made parties shall not be bound by the proceedings.

History.

Acts 1895, No. 146, § 19, p. 217; C. & M. Dig., § 6928; Pope's Dig., § 8890; A.S.A. 1947, § 51-618.

18-44-124. Contractor to defend actions on liens by third persons — Liability.

(a)

In all cases in which a lien shall be filed under the provisions of this subchapter by any person other than a contractor, it shall be the duty of the contractor to defend at his or her own expense any action brought thereupon. During the pendency of the action, the owner may withhold from the contractor the amount of money for which the lien shall be filed.

(b)(1)

In case of judgment against the owner or his or her property upon the lien, the owner shall be entitled to deduct from any amount due by him or her to the contractor the amount of the judgment and costs.

(2)

If the owner shall have settled with the contractor in full, he or she shall be entitled to recover back from the contractor any amount so paid by the owner for which the contractor was originally liable.

History.

Acts 1895, No. 146, § 8, p. 217; C. & M. Dig., § 6919; Pope's Dig., § 8878; A.S.A. 1947, § 51-610.

Parties.

The contractor is a necessary party to action to enforce lien. Simpson v. J.W. Black Lumber Co., 114 Ark. 464, 172 S.W. 883 (1914); Cruce v. Mitchell, 122 Ark. 141, 182 S.W. 530 (1916); Rasmussen v. Reed, 255 Ark. 1064, 505 S.W.2d 222 (1974); Johnson v. Southern Elec., Inc., 29 Ark. App. 160, 779 S.W.2d 190 (1989).

Alleged “contractor” not required to be made a party where evidence established that he actually owned property at time lien was filed and subsequently deeded property to defendants. McCool v. Jones, 221 Ark. 123, 252 S.W.2d 80 (1952).

Cited:

Superior Iron Works & Supply Co. v. Saulsberry, 226 Ark. 1032, 295 S.W.2d 626 (1956).

18-44-125. Court orders.

The court shall make orders in the case as will protect and enforce the rights of all interested therein.

History.

Acts 1895, No. 146, § 20, p. 217; C. & M. Dig., § 6930; Pope's Dig., § 8892; A.S.A. 1947, § 51-620.

18-44-126. Warning order for nonresident or absconding owners.

Whenever the owner of an erection or improvement, or of land on which an erection or improvement is put, or the owner of any boat or vessel, is a nonresident of the state or resides out of the county in which the erection or other improvement is put, as provided by this subchapter, or when the owner so conceals himself or herself that personal service of summons cannot be had on him or her, then the mechanic, builder, artisan, workman, laborer, or other persons entitled to a lien under this subchapter, upon instituting suit, may cause a warning order to issue and be published as may be prescribed by law for the issuance of warning orders in proceedings under attachment. Such service shall be binding and of full force and effect.

History.

Acts 1895, No. 146, § 16, p. 217; C. & M. Dig., § 6929; Pope's Dig., § 8891; A.S.A. 1947, § 51-619.

18-44-127. Trial and judgment.

(a)

The court shall ascertain by a fair trial, in the usual way, the amount of the indebtedness for which the lien is prosecuted and may render judgment therefor in any sum not exceeding the amount claimed in the demand filed with the lien, together with interest and costs, although the creditor may have unintentionally failed to render in his or her account when filed the full amount of credits to which the debtor may have been entitled.

(b)

The judgment if for the plaintiff shall be that he or she recover the amount of the indebtedness found due, to be levied out of the property charged with the lien therefor, and the property charged shall be correctly described in the judgment.

History.

Acts 1895, No. 146, § 14, p. 217; C. & M. Dig., § 6931; Pope's Dig., § 8893; A.S.A. 1947, § 51-621.

18-44-128. Attorney's fee.

(a)

When any contractor, subcontractor, laborer, or material supplier who has filed a lien, as provided for in this chapter, gives notice thereof to the owner of property by any method permitted under §18-44-115(b)(5) and the claim has not been paid within twenty (20) days from the date of service of the notice, and if the contractor, subcontractor, laborer, or material supplier is required to sue for the enforcement of his or her claim, the court shall allow the successful contractor, subcontractor, laborer, or material supplier a reasonable attorney's fee in addition to other relief to which he or she may be entitled.

(b)

If the owner is the prevailing party in the action, the court shall allow the owner a reasonable attorney's fee in addition to any other relief to which the owner may be entitled.

History.

Acts 1961, No. 240, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 51-639; Acts 1995, No. 1298, § 9; 2009, No. 454, § 5.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment added (b), and redesignated and rewrote the remaining text.

18-44-129, 18-44-130. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

These sections, concerning execution generally, sales under execution, and removal, were repealed by Acts 1995, No. 1298, § 10. The sections were derived from the following sources:

18-44-129. Acts 1895, No. 146, § 21, p. 217; C. & M. Dig., § 6932; Pope's Dig., § 8894; A.S.A. 1947, § 51-622.

18-44-130. Acts 1895, No. 146, § 3, p. 217; C. & M. Dig., § 6909; Pope's Dig., § 8868; A.S.A. 1947, § 51-605.

18-44-131. Duty to enter satisfaction.

(a)

Whenever any indebtedness which is a lien on any real estate, erection, building, or other improvement is paid and satisfied, it shall be the duty of the creditor to enter satisfaction of the lien upon the record or margin thereof in the office of the clerk of the circuit court.

(b)

Any creditor refusing or neglecting to do so for ten (10) days after payment shall be liable to any person injured to the amount of injury and for cost of suit.

History.

Acts 1895, No. 146, § 23, p. 217; C. & M. Dig., § 6934; Pope's Dig., § 8896; A.S.A. 1947, § 51-624.

18-44-132. Penalty for failure to discharge lien after payment.

(a)

It shall be unlawful for any contractor, subcontractor, or other person who has performed work or furnished materials for the improvement of any property when the work or materials may give rise to a mechanic's, laborer's, or materialman's lien under the laws of this state, this subchapter and §§18-44-201 —18-44-210 and18-44-301 —18-44-305, or any other statute providing for a mechanic's, laborer's, or materialman's lien, or the assignee of such person, knowingly to receive payment of the contract price or any portion of it without applying the money so received toward the discharge of any liens known to the person receiving the payment, or properly record it as required by statutes, with the intent thereby to deprive the owner or person so paying the contractor or other person receiving payment of his or her funds without discharging the liens and thereby to defraud the owner or person so paying.

(b)

In any prosecution under this section as against the person so receiving payment, when it shall be shown in evidence that any lien for labor or materials existed in favor of any mechanic, laborer, or materialman and that the lien has been filed within the time provided by law in the office of the circuit clerk or other officer provided by law for the filing of such liens, and that the contractor, subcontractor, or other person charged has received payment without discharging the lien to the extent of the funds received by him or her, then the fact of acceptance of the payment without having discharged the lien within ten (10) days after receipt of the payment or the receipt of notice of the existence of the lien, whichever event shall occur last, shall be prima facie evidence of intent to defraud on the part of the person so receiving payment.

(c)(1)

If the amount of the contract price so received and not applied to the discharge of the liens, with the intent to defraud, shall exceed the sum of twenty-five dollars ($25.00), the party so receiving shall be deemed guilty of a felony and shall be punished by a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000) or by imprisonment in the Department of Corrections for not less than one (1) year nor more than five (5) years, or by both.

(2)

If the amount so received does not exceed the sum of twenty-five dollars ($25.00), the party shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor and punished by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than one (1) year or by fine not less than ten dollars ($10.00) nor more than three hundred dollars ($300), or by both.

History.

Acts 1963, No. 66, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 51-640.

18-44-133, 18-44-134. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

These sections, concerning lien of architect, engineer, surveyor, appraiser, abstractor, or title insurance agent, and landscaping services and supplies, were repealed by Acts 2009, No. 454, § 6. The sections were derived from the following sources:

18-44-133: Acts 1987, No. 1035, §
1; 1991, No. 786, §
30.

18-44-134: Acts 1995, No. 1298, § 11.

18-44-135. Jointly owned property.

In the event that property is jointly owned, the signature of one (1) of the owners is sufficient for the purposes of this chapter.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 1298, § 12.

Subchapter 2

— Wells, Mines, and Quarries Generally

Cross References.

Laborer's liens on oil and gas wells, mines or quarries, §18-43-103.

Effective Dates.

Acts 1923, No. 513, § 3: effective on passage.

Acts 1923, No. 615, § 13: Mar. 23, 1923. Emergency clause provided: “This act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public health, peace and safety, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

18-44-201. Construction.

The provisions of this section and §§18-44-202 —18-44-210 shall not be construed to deprive or abridge materialmen, artisans, laborers, or mechanics of any rights and remedies given them by law, and the provisions of this section and §§18-44-202 —18-44-210 shall be cumulative of the lien laws of this state.

History.

Acts 1923, No. 615, § 6; Pope's Dig., § 8910; A.S.A. 1947, § 51-706.

18-44-202. Right to lien in general — Extent.

(a)

Any person, corporation, firm, association, partnership, material man, artisan, laborer, or mechanic who when under contract, express or implied, made with the owner or lessee of any land, mine, or quarry, or the owner of any gas, oil, or mineral leasehold interest in land, or the owner of any gas pipeline or oil pipeline, or owner of any oil or gas pipeline right-of-way, or with the trustee, agent, or receiver of any such owner, performs labor, or furnishes fuel, material, machinery, or supplies used in the digging, drilling, torpedoing, operating, completing, equipping, maintaining, or repairing of any oil or gas well, water well, mine or quarry, or oil or gas pipeline, including any and all tanks or other receptacles used or intended for the storage of oil, regardless of where the oil is produced, shall have a lien on:

(1)

The whole of the land or leasehold interest therein;

(2)

Any oil pipeline or gas pipeline including the right-of-way for the pipeline;

(3)

Any lease for oil and gas purposes, the buildings and appurtenances, the materials and supplies so furnished, the oil well, gas well, water well, oil or gas pipeline, mine, or quarry for which they are furnished, and on all of the other oil wells, gas wells, buildings and appurtenances including pipelines, leasehold interests, and land used in operating for oil, gas, and other minerals; or

(4)

The leasehold, land, or pipeline and the right-of-way therefor for which the material and supplies were furnished or labor performed, whether they are movable or not.

(b)

If labor supplies, machinery, or material are furnished to a leaseholder, the lien created by this section shall not attach to the underlying fee title to the land.

History.

Acts 1923, No. 615, § 1; Pope's Dig., § 8905; A.S.A. 1947, § 51-701.

18-44-203. Furnishing materials or labor to contractors or subcontractors.

Any person, corporation, firm, association, partnership, or materialman who furnishes machinery, material, or supplies to a contractor or subcontractor or any person who performs labor under a subcontractor with a contractor, or who as an artisan or day laborer in the employ of a contractor or subcontractor performs any labor, shall have a lien on the land or leasehold interest therein, or on the oil pipeline or gas pipeline including the pipeline right-of-way, or on a lease for oil or gas purposes, on the buildings and appurtenances, and on the materials and supplies furnished and on the oil well, gas well, water well, oil or gas pipeline and the right-of-way therefor, mine, or quarry for which they are furnished, and on all of the other oil wells, buildings and appurtenances, leasehold interest, oil or gas pipeline including right-of-way, or land used in the operating for oil, gas, or other minerals upon which leasehold or land for which the material and supplies were furnished and labor performed, in the same manner and to the same extent as the original contractor, for the amount due him or her for the material furnished or labor performed.

History.

Acts 1923, No. 615, § 3; Pope's Dig., § 8907; A.S.A. 1947, § 51-703.

18-44-204. Labor or materials furnished refinery or gasoline extraction plants.

(a)

The lien created by this section and §§18-44-201 —18-44-203 and18-44-205 —18-44-210 shall apply in favor of any person, corporation, firm, association, or partnership who shall furnish any material, machinery, or supplies or perform any labor in the erection, operation, or repair of any refinery or gasoline extraction plant.

(b)

The lien shall cover the plant, together with the land upon which it is situated, including all pipelines belonging to the refinery or gasoline extraction plant and used in connection therewith.

History.

Acts 1923, No. 615, § 2; Pope's Dig., § 8906; A.S.A. 1947, § 51-702.

18-44-205. Improvements on leased land.

The provisions of §18-44-103 shall not apply to liens created by this subchapter, and in foreclosures under this section and §§18-44-201 —18-44-204 and18-44-206 —18-44-210, all the right, title, and interest of the leaseholder shall be subjected to the lien created by it.

History.

Acts 1923, No. 615, § 10; Pope's Dig., § 8914; A.S.A. 1947, § 51-709.

18-44-206. Priority generally.

(a)(1)

The lien given in this section and §§18-44-201 —18-44-205 and18-44-207 —18-44-210 against the land or leasehold interest in the land, on the oil pipeline or gas pipeline, including the right-of-way, on any lease for oil and gas purposes, including the buildings and appurtenances on the land, on the materials and supplies so furnished, on the oil well, gas well, water well, oil or gas pipeline, mine, or quarry for which the materials were furnished or labor performed, and on all other oil wells, gas wells, and water wells on the lands shall be prior and paramount to, and in preference of, any and all subsequent liens, encumbrances, and mortgages.

(2)

Except as provided in this subchapter, all liens established in this subchapter shall be of equal dignity.

(b)(1)

The lien provided for in this section and §§18-44-201 —18-44-205 and18-44-207 —18-44-210 shall attach to the machinery, material, supplies, and to any specific improvements made in preference to any prior lien, encumbrance, or mortgage upon the land or leasehold interest upon which the machinery, material, supplies, or specific improvements are placed or located.

(2)

However, any lien, encumbrance, or mortgage upon the land, or any leasehold interest, existing at the time of the inception of the lien provided for in these sections shall not be affected by the new lien, and such holders of liens upon the land or leasehold interest shall not be necessary parties in suits to foreclose the lien created.

History.

Acts 1923, No. 615, § 4; Pope's Dig., § 8908; A.S.A. 1947, § 51-704.

18-44-207. Lien of common laborer superior.

(a)

As between the various liens provided by §§18-44-202 —18-44-204, that given common laborers shall be superior to all other liens perfected under this section and §§18-44-201 —18-44-206 and18-44-208 —18-44-210.

(b)

The term “common laborer” shall mean not only persons actually performing manual labor in the drilling, operating, completing, equipping, maintaining, and repairing oil or gas wells, but to also include persons hauling supplies or machinery to be used in the drilling, operating, equipping, maintaining, or repairing of any oil or gas wells.

History.

Acts 1923, No. 615, § 12; Pope's Dig., § 8915; A.S.A. 1947, § 51-710.

18-44-208. Proceedings for establishment and enforcement.

(a)

Except as expressly provided in this section and §§18-44-201 —18-44-207 and18-44-209 —18-44-210, the lien created under the provisions of these sections shall be construed, established, preserved, and enforced in like manner and in the same time as liens of mechanics are construed, established, preserved, and enforced.

(b)(1)

When the labor performed or the material, supplies, or machinery furnished was entered under an open, running account, that shall be construed as a continuous contract, and the time within which the verified statement of the claim for lien shall be filed with the clerk of the circuit court shall be computed from the time upon which the last labor was in good faith performed or the last material, machinery, or supplies were in good faith furnished.

(2)

The lien provided for, when perfected in the manner set out in this subchapter, shall be held in law and equity as security for the entire open, running account whether it has been partially closed by note or not.

(c)(1)

Whenever any person shall remove any encumbered property to a county other than the one in which the lien has been filed, the lienholder, within ninety (90) days after removal, may file an itemized inventory of the property so removed.

(2)(A)

The inventory shall show how much there is due and unpaid thereon and shall be filed with the circuit clerk of the county to which it has been removed.

(B)

This filing shall operate as notice of the existence of the lien and the lien shall attach, and extend to, the land or leasehold and other premises, properties, and appurtenances to which the properties so removed shall attach of the kind and character enumerated in §§18-44-202 —18-44-204.

History.

Acts 1923, No. 615, § 8; Pope's Dig., § 8912; A.S.A. 1947, § 51-708.

18-44-209. Sale or removal of property subject to lien.

(a)

When the lien provided for in this section and §§18-44-201 —18-44-208 and18-44-210 shall have attached to the property covered thereby, neither the owner of the land nor the owner of the oil, gas, or mineral leasehold interest therein, the owner of any gas pipeline or oil pipeline, the contractor, the subcontractor, the purchaser, the trustee, receiver, or agent, of the owner, lessor, lessee, contractor, subcontractor, or purchaser shall either sell or remove any property subject to the lien, cause it to be removed from the land or premises upon which the property was to be used, or otherwise sell or dispose of it without the written consent of the holder of the lien created.

(b)(1)

In case of any violation of the provision of this section, the same lienholder shall be entitled to the possession of the property upon which the lien exists wherever the property is found, together with the land or leasehold to which the property may have been attached.

(2)

The lienholder is entitled to have it then sold for the payment of his or her debt, whether the debt has become due or not.

History.

Acts 1923, No. 615, § 5; Pope's Dig., § 8909; A.S.A. 1947, § 51-705.

18-44-210. Limitation of liability.

Nothing in §§18-44-201 —18-44-209 shall be construed to fix a greater liability against the owner of the land or leasehold interest in the land than the price or sum stipulated to be paid in the contract under which the material is furnished or labor performed.

History.

Acts 1923, No. 615, § 7; Pope's Dig., § 8911; A.S.A. 1947, § 51-707.

18-44-211. Lien on output and equipment of oil or gas well.

(a)(1)

Any person working in or about the drilling or operation of any oil or gas well or any well being drilled for oil or gas in this state shall have a lien upon the output and production of the oil or gas well for the amount due for his or her work.

(2)

In addition, his or her lien shall attach to all the machinery, tools, equipment, and implements used in the drilling or operation of oil or gas wells, including all leases to oil or gas rights on the land upon which the drilling or operation is performed.

(b)(1)

This lien shall not be construed to be a lien upon the real estate of the employer or lessee.

(2)

However, the lien shall be upon the personal property used and connected with the drilling and operations, on the output or production of the oil or gas wells, and on the oil or gas lease on the land.

(c)

This lien shall be enforced in the same manner provided by law for the enforcement of laborer's liens.

History.

Acts 1923, No. 513, §§ 1, 2; Pope's Dig., §§ 8916, 8917; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 51-320, 51-321.

Subchapter 3

— Wells, Mines, and Quarries — Trucking and Teaming Contractors

18-44-301. Construction.

The provisions of this subchapter shall not be construed to deprive or abridge materialmen, artisans, laborers, or mechanics of any rights and remedies given them by law, and the provisions of this subchapter shall be cumulative of the present lien laws of this state, except as repealed or modified by this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1941, No. 71, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 51-714.

18-44-302. Right to lien — Extent.

(a)

Any person, corporation, firm, association, or partnership, designated as a trucking contractor or teaming contractor and engaged in the hauling of oil field equipment used in, or about, the drilling of oil and gas wells or the operation of oil or gas leases in the production of oil or gas therefrom, who under contract, express or implied, made with the owner or lessee of any land, or the owner of any gas, oil, or mineral leasehold interest in land, or the owner of any gas pipeline or oil pipeline, or owner of any oil or gas pipeline right-of-way, or with the trustee, agent, or receiver of any such owner, furnishes trucks, teams, tractors, draglines, and any other equipment and labor for the hauling of fuel, material, machinery, or supplies used in the digging, drilling, torpedoing, operating, completing, equipping, maintaining, or repairing of any oil or gas well, water well, or oil or gas pipeline, including any and all tanks or other receptacles used or intended for the storage of oil, regardless of where the oil is produced, or used for the clearing of land for location of wells, rights-of-way, or digging of earthen pits upon the land shall have a lien on:

(1)

The whole of the land or leasehold interest in the land, the oil pipeline or gas pipeline, including the pipeline right-of-way, the buildings and appurtenances located thereon, and the materials and supplies so hauled by trucks or teams furnished;

(2)

All other materials and supplies located upon the land or leasehold interest, whether hauled by the trucks, teams, tractors, draglines, or other equipment, or not and the oil well, gas well, water well, or oil or gas pipeline for which they are hauled; and

(3)

All the other oil wells, gas wells, buildings, and appurtenances including pipelines, leasehold interests, and land used in operating for oil or gas under a leasehold interest.

(b)(1)

Also included in the lien are the pipelines and the pipeline right-of-way for which the materials, equipment, and supplies were hauled by the trucks, teams, tractors, draglines, or other equipment and all other materials, supplies, or equipment placed upon the land or leasehold interest, whether they are movable or not.

(2)

If the hauling is done and performed for a leaseholder, the lien created shall not attach to the underlying fee title to the land.

History.

Acts 1941, No. 71, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 51-711.

18-44-303. Priority.

(a)

The lien given in this subchapter against the land, or leasehold interest in the land, and against the oil pipeline or gas pipeline, including the pipeline right-of-way, the lease for oil or gas purposes, including the buildings and appurtenances situated on the land, the materials and supplies hauled by trucks, teams, tractors, draglines, or other equipment furnished for that purpose and used upon and about the oil or gas well, water well, oil or gas pipeline, and all other supplies, equipment, materials, buildings, and improvements used upon all other oil wells, gas wells, water wells, leasehold interests, etc., upon the leasehold interest or land to which the lien attaches shall be prior and paramount to, and in preference of, any and all prior or subsequent liens, including materialman's liens, encumbrances, mortgages, bills of sale, or assignments of interest.

(b)

The lien for hauling shall be of equal dignity with that of the common laborer who actually performs manual labor on or about drilling, operating, completing, equipping, maintaining, and repairing oil or gas wells, or in the production of oil and gas, the laying and removal of pipelines, and the building of storage tanks.

(c)

The lien provided for shall attach in preference to any prior or subsequent lien or encumbrances, including materialman's liens, or mortgages, or assignments of interest, or bills of sale.

History.

Acts 1941, No. 71, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 51-712.

18-44-304. Proceedings for establishment and enforcement.

(a)

The lien created in this subchapter shall be construed, established, preserved, and enforced in like manner and in the same time as liens of mechanics are construed, established, preserved, or enforced.

(b)

When the trucks, teams, tractors, draglines, or other equipment, and labor are furnished and hauling done was entered under an open, running account, that shall be construed as a continuous contract, and the time within which the verified statement of the claim for lien shall be filed with the clerk of the circuit court shall be computed from the time when the last hauling or excavation work was in good faith performed.

(c)

When perfected in the manner set out in this subchapter, the lien provided for in this subchapter shall be held in law and equity as security for the entire open, running account, whether the account has been partially closed by note or not.

History.

Acts 1941, No. 71, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 51-713.

18-44-305. Removal of property subject to lien.

(a)

Whenever any person shall remove any property subject to a lien under this subchapter to a county other than the one in which the lien has been filed, the lienholder, within ninety (90) days thereafter, may file an itemized inventory of the property so removed, showing how much is due and unpaid thereon, with the circuit clerk of the county to which it has been removed.

(b)

The filing shall operate as notice of the existence of the lien, and the lien shall attach and extend to the land or leasehold interest and other premises, property, and appurtenances to which the property so removed shall attach.

History.

Acts 1941, No. 71, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 51-713.

Subchapter 4

— Railroads

Cross References.

Operation and maintenance of railroads, §23-12-101 et seq.

Effective Dates.

Acts 1887, No. 70, § 2: effective on passage.

Acts 1899, No. 88, § 4: effective on passage.

18-44-401. Accrual of lien — Lien of injury.

There shall be a lien on the railroad for the labor, materials, machinery, fixtures, board, provisions, supplies, loss, damage, and services upon the roadbed, buildings, equipment, income, franchise, right-of-way, and all other appurtenances of the railroad for:

(1)

Every mechanic, contractor, subcontractor, builder, artisan, workman, laborer, or other person who shall do or perform any work or labor, or cause to be done or performed any work or labor upon, or furnish any materials, machinery, fixtures, or other things toward the building, construction, or equipment of any railroad, or to facilitating the operation of any railroad whether completed or not;

(2)

Every person who performs work of any kind in the construction or repair of any railroad, whether under contract with the railroad or with a contractor or subcontractor thereof;

(3)

Every person who furnishes any board, provisions, or supplies for any employees, or teams of any railroad employed in the construction or repair thereof, with the consent or authority of the person authorized to make the construction or repair;

(4)

Every person who shall sustain loss or damage to person or property from any railroad for which a liability may exist at law; and

(5)

Every person who performs any valuable services, manual or professional, for any railroad by or from which the railroad receives a benefit.

History.

Acts 1887, No. 70, § 1, p. 96; 1899, No. 88, § 1, p. 145; C. & M. Dig., § 8555; Pope's Dig., § 11131; A.S.A. 1947, § 73-737.

18-44-402. Priority.

A lien created under §18-44-401 shall be superior and paramount to that of all persons interested in the railroad as managers, lessees, mortgagees, trustees, beneficiaries under trusts, or owners, whether prior in time or not.

History.

Acts 1887, No. 70, § 1, p. 96; 1899, No. 88, § 1, p. 145; C. & M. Dig., § 8555; Pope's Dig., § 11131; A.S.A. 1947, § 73-737.

18-44-403. Limitations of actions.

The lien mentioned in §18-44-401 shall not be effectual unless suit is brought upon the claim or unless the claim is filed by order of court with the receiver of the railroad within one (1) year after the claim has accrued.

History.

Acts 1887, No. 70, § 1, p. 96; 1899, No. 88, § 2, p. 145; C. & M. Dig., § 8556; Pope's Dig., § 11132; A.S.A. 1947, § 73-738.

18-44-404. Judgment.

The lien shall be mentioned in the judgment rendered for claimant in the ordinary suit for the claim, or in any order of court allowing such claim as a just charge against any railroad in the hands of a receiver.

History.

Acts 1887, No. 70, § 1, p. 96; 1899, No. 88, § 3, p. 145; C. & M. Dig., § 8557; Pope's Dig., § 11133; A.S.A. 1947, § 73-739.

18-44-405. Enforcement.

The lien may be enforced by ordinary levy and sale under final or other process at law or equity.

History.

Acts 1887, No. 70, § 1, p. 96; 1899, No. 88, § 3, p. 145; C. & M. Dig., § 8557; Pope's Dig., § 11133; A.S.A. 1947, § 73-739.